Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB238.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XI-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is repealed:[ARTICLE XI-CREALTY TRANSFER TAXSection 1101-C. Definitions.--The following words when used in this article shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:"Agricultural production." As defined in section 3 of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the "Agricultural Area Security Law." 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Association." A general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership or any other form of unincorporated enterprise, owned or conducted by two or more persons other than a private trust or decedent's estate. "Conservancy." A corporation or association that possesses a tax-exempt status pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) and which has as its primary purpose preservation of land for historic, recreational, scenic, agricultural or open-space opportunities."Corporation." A corporation, joint-stock association, business trust or banking institution which is organized under the laws of this Commonwealth, the United States, or any other state, territory, or foreign country, or dependency."Department." The Department of Revenue of this Commonwealth."Document." Any deed, instrument or writing which conveys, transfers, demises, vests, confirms or evidences any transfer or demise of title to real estate in this Commonwealth, but does not include wills, mortgages, deeds of trust or other instruments of like character given as security for a debt and deeds of release thereof to the debtor, land contracts whereby the legal title does not pass to the grantee until the total consideration specified in the contract has been paid or any cancellation thereof unless the consideration is payable over a period of time exceeding thirty years or instruments which solely grant, vest or confirm a public utility easement. "Document" shall also include a declaration of acquisition required to be presented for recording under section 1102-C.5 of this article.20250SB0238PN0192 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Family farm business." A corporation or association of which at least seventy-five per cent of its assets are devoted to the business of agriculture and at least seventy-five per cent of each class of stock of the corporation or the interests in the association is continuously owned by members of the same family. The business of agriculture shall include the leasing to members of the same family or the leasing to a corporation or association owned by members of the same family of property which is directly and principally used for agricultural purposes. The business of agriculture shall not be deemed to include:(1) recreational activities such as, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, skiing, show competition or racing;(2) the raising, breeding or training of game animals or game birds, fish, cats, dogs or pets or animals intended for use in sporting or recreational activities;(3) fur farming;(4) stockyard and slaughterhouse operations; or(5) manufacturing or processing operations of any kind."Living trust." Any trust, other than a business trust, intended as a will substitute by the settlor which becomes effective during the lifetime of the settlor, but from which trust distributions cannot be made to any beneficiaries other than the settlor prior to the death of the settlor."Members of the same family." Any individual, such individual's brothers and sisters, the brothers and sisters of such individual's parents and grandparents, the ancestors and lineal descendents of any of the foregoing, a spouse of any of the foregoing and the estate of any of the foregoing. Individuals related by the half blood or legal adoption shall be 20250SB0238PN0192 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 treated as if they were related by the whole blood."Ordinary trust." Any trust, other than a business trust or a living trust, which takes effect during the lifetime of the settlor and for which the trustees of the trust take title to property primarily for the purpose of protecting, managing or conserving it until distribution to the named beneficiaries of the trust. An ordinary trust does not include a trust that has an objective to carry on business and divide gains, nor does it either expressly or impliedly have any of the following features: the treatment of beneficiaries as associates, the treatment of the interests in the trust as personal property, the free transferability of beneficial interests in the trust, centralized management by the trustee or the beneficiaries, or continuity of life."Person." Every natural person, association, or corporation. Whenever used in any clause prescribing and imposing a fine or imprisonment, or both, the term "person" as applied to associations, shall include the responsible members or general partners thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers thereof."Qualified beginner farmer." A person that:(1) Has demonstrated experience in the agriculture industry or related field or has transferable skills as determined by the Department of Agriculture.(2) Has not received Federal gross income from agricultural production for more than the ten most recent taxable years.(3) Intends to engage in agricultural production within the borders of this Commonwealth and to provide the majority of the labor and management involved in that agricultural production.(4) Has obtained written certification from the Department 20250SB0238PN0192 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Agriculture confirming qualified beginner farmer status."Real estate."(1) Any lands, tenements or hereditaments, including, without limitation, buildings, structures, fixtures, mines, minerals, oil, gas, quarries, spaces with or without upper or lower boundaries, trees and other improvements, immovables or interests which by custom, usage or law pass with a conveyance of land, but excluding permanently attached machinery and equipment in an industrial plant.(2) A condominium unit.(3) A tenant-stockholder's interest in a cooperative housing corporation, trust or association under a proprietary lease or occupancy agreement."Real estate company." A corporation or association which meets any of the following:(1) Is primarily engaged in the business of holding, selling or leasing real estate ninety per cent or more of the ownership interest in which is held by thirty-five or fewer persons and which:(i) derives sixty per cent or more of its annual gross receipts from the ownership or disposition of real estate; or(ii) holds real estate, the value of which comprises ninety per cent or more of the value of its entire tangible asset holdings exclusive of tangible assets which are freely transferable and actively traded on an established market.(2) Ninety per cent or more of the ownership interest in the corporation or association is held by thirty-five or fewer persons, and the corporation or association owns, as ninety per cent or more of the fair market value of its assets, a direct or indirect interest in a real estate company. An indirect 20250SB0238PN0192 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ownership interest is an interest in a corporation or association, ninety per cent or more of the ownership interest which is held by thirty-five or fewer persons whose purpose is the ownership of a real estate company."Title to real estate."(1) Any interest in real estate which endures for a period of time, the termination of which is not fixed or ascertained by a specific number of years, including, without limitation, an estate in fee simple, life estate or perpetual leasehold; or(2) any interest in real estate enduring for a fixed period of years but which, either by reason of the length of the term or the grant of a right to extend the term by renewal or otherwise, consists of a group of rights approximating those of an estate in fee simple, life estate or perpetual leasehold, including, without limitation, a leasehold interest or possessory interest under a lease or occupancy agreement for a term of thirty years or more or a leasehold interest or possessory interest in real estate in which the lessee has equity."Transaction." The making, executing, delivering, accepting, or presenting for recording of a document."Value."(1) In the case of any bona fide sale of real estate at arm's length for actual monetary worth, the amount of the actual consideration therefor, paid or to be paid, including liens or other encumbrances thereon existing before the transfer and not removed thereby, whether or not the underlying indebtedness is assumed, and ground rents, or a commensurate part thereof where such liens or other encumbrances and ground rents also encumber or are charged against other real estate: Provided, That where 20250SB0238PN0192 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 such documents shall set forth a nominal consideration, the "value" thereof shall be determined from the price set forth in or actual consideration for the contract of sale;(2) in the case of a gift, sale by execution upon a judgment or upon the foreclosure of a mortgage by a judicial officer, transactions without consideration or for consideration less than the actual monetary worth of the real estate, a taxable lease, an occupancy agreement, a leasehold or possessory interest, any exchange of properties, or the real estate of an acquired company, the actual monetary worth of the real estate determined by adjusting the assessed value of the real estate for local real estate tax purposes for the common level ratio of assessed values to market values of the taxing district as established by the State Tax Equalization Board, or a commensurate part of the assessment where the assessment includes other real estate;(3) in the case of an easement or other interest in real estate the value of which is not determinable under clause (1) or (2), the actual monetary worth of such interest; or(4) the actual consideration for or actual monetary worth of any executory agreement for the construction of buildings, structures or other permanent improvements to real estate between the grantor and other persons existing before the transfer and not removed thereby or between the grantor, the agent or principal of the grantor or a related corporation, association or partnership and the grantee existing before or effective with the transfer."Veterans' service organization." A not-for-profit organization that has been chartered by the Congress of the United States to service veterans or is a member of the State 20250SB0238PN0192 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Veterans' Commission under 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 (relating to State Veterans' Commission and Deputy Adjutant General for Veterans' Affairs)."Volunteer emergency medical services agency." The term shall have the same meaning as given to the term "volunteer ambulance service" in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer rescue company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).Section 1102-C. Imposition of Tax.--Every person who makes, executes, delivers, accepts or presents for recording any document or in whose behalf any document is made, executed, delivered, accepted or presented for recording, shall be subject to pay for and in respect to the transaction or any part thereof, or for or in respect of the vellum parchment or paper upon which such document is written or printed, a State tax at the rate of one per cent of the value of the real estate within this Commonwealth represented by such document, which State tax shall be payable at the earlier of the time the document is presented for recording or within thirty days of acceptance of such document or within thirty days of becoming an acquired company.Section 1102-C.2. Exempt Parties.--The United States, the Commonwealth or any of their instrumentalities, agencies or political subdivisions, or veterans' service organizations shall be exempt from payment of the tax imposed by this article. The exemption under this section shall not, however, relieve any other party to a transaction from liability for the tax.20250SB0238PN0192 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:(1) A transfer to the Commonwealth or to any of its instrumentalities, agencies or political subdivisions by gift, dedication or deed in lieu of condemnation or deed of confirmation in connection with condemnation proceedings, or a reconveyance by the condemning body of the property condemned to the owner of record at the time of condemnation, which reconveyance may include property line adjustments provided said reconveyance is made within one year from the date of condemnation.(2) A document which the Commonwealth is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or statutes of the United States.(3) A conveyance to a municipality, township, school district or county pursuant to acquisition by the municipality, township, school district or county of a tax delinquent property at sheriff sale or tax claim bureau sale.(4) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration which corrects or confirms a transfer previously recorded, but which does not extend or limit existing record legal title or interest.(5) A transfer of division in kind for no or nominal actual consideration of property passed by testate or intestate succession and held by cotenants; however, if any of the parties take shares greater in value than their undivided interest, tax is due on the excess.(6) A transfer between husband and wife, between persons who were previously husband and wife who have since been divorced, provided the property or interest therein subject to such transfer was acquired by the husband and wife or husband or wife 20250SB0238PN0192 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to the granting of the final decree in divorce, between parent and child or the spouse of such child, between a stepparent and a stepchild or the spouse of the stepchild, between brother or sister or spouse of a brother or sister and brother or sister or the spouse of a brother or sister and between a grandparent and grandchild or the spouse of such grandchild, except that a subsequent transfer by the grantee within one year shall be subject to tax as if the grantor were making such transfer.(7) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration of property passing by testate or intestate succession from a personal representative of a decedent to the decedent's devisee or heir.(8) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration to a trustee of an ordinary trust where the transfer of the same property would be exempt if the transfer was made directly from the grantor to all of the possible beneficiaries that are entitled to receive the property or proceeds from the sale of the property under the trust, whether or not such beneficiaries are contingent or specifically named. A trust clause which identifies the contingent beneficiaries by reference to the heirs of the trust settlor as determined by the laws of the intestate succession shall not disqualify a transfer from the exclusion provided by this clause. No such exemption shall be granted unless the recorder of deeds is presented with a copy of the trust instrument that clearly identifies the grantor and all possible beneficiaries.(8.1) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration to a trustee of a living trust from the settlor of the living trust. No such exemption shall be granted unless the recorder of deeds 20250SB0238PN0192 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is presented with a copy of the living trust instrument.(9) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration from a trustee of an ordinary trust to a specifically named beneficiary that is entitled to receive the property under the recorded trust instrument or to a contingent beneficiary where the transfer of the same property would be exempt if the transfer was made by the grantor of the property into the trust to that beneficiary. However, any transfer of real estate from a living trust during the settlor's lifetime shall be considered for the purposes of this article as if such transfer were made directly from the settlor to the grantee.(9.1) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration from a trustee of a living trust after the death of the settlor of the trust or from a trustee of a trust created pursuant to the will of a decedent to a beneficiary to whom the property is devised or bequeathed.(9.2) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration from the trustee of a living trust to the settlor of the living trust if such property was originally conveyed to the trustee by the settlor.(10) A transfer for no or nominal actual consideration from trustee to successor trustee.(11) A transfer:(i) for no or nominal actual consideration between principal and agent or straw party; or(ii) from or to an agent or straw party where, if the agent or straw party were his principal, no tax would be imposed under this article.Where the document by which title is acquired by a grantee or statement of value fails to set forth that the property was 20250SB0238PN0192 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquired by the grantee from, or for the benefit of, his principal, there is a rebuttable presumption that the property is the property of the grantee in his individual capacity if the grantee claims an exemption from taxation under this clause.(12) A transfer made pursuant to the statutory merger or consolidation of a corporation or statutory division of a nonprofit corporation, except where the department reasonably determines that the primary intent for such merger, consolidation or division is avoidance of the tax imposed by this article.(13) A transfer from a corporation or association of real estate held of record in the name of the corporation or association where the grantee owns stock of the corporation or an interest in the association in the same proportion as his interest in or ownership of the real estate being conveyed and where the stock of the corporation or the interest in the association has been held by the grantee for more than two years.(14) A transfer from a nonprofit industrial development agency or authority to a grantee of property conveyed by the grantee to that agency or authority as security for a debt of the grantee or a transfer to a nonprofit industrial development agency or authority.(15) A transfer from a nonprofit industrial development agency or authority to a grantee purchasing directly from it, but only if:(i) the grantee shall directly use such real estate for the primary purpose of manufacturing, fabricating, compounding, processing, publishing, research and development, transportation, energy conversion, energy production, pollution 20250SB0238PN0192 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 control, warehousing or agriculture; and(ii) the agency or authority has the full ownership interest in the real estate transferred.(16) A transfer by a mortgagor to the holder of a bona fide mortgage in default in lieu of a foreclosure or a transfer pursuant to a judicial sale in which the successful bidder is the bona fide holder of a mortgage, unless the holder assigns the bid to another person.(17) Any transfer between religious organizations or other bodies or persons holding title for a religious organization if such real estate is not being or has not been used by such transferor for commercial purposes.(18) Any of the following:(i) A transfer to a conservancy.(ii) A transfer from a conservancy to the United States, the Commonwealth or to any of their instrumentalities, agencies or political subdivisions.(iii) A transfer from a conservancy where the real estate is encumbered by a perpetual agricultural conservation easement as defined by the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the "Agricultural Area Security Law," and such conservancy has owned the real estate for at least two years immediately prior to the transfer.(iv) A transfer of an agricultural conservation easement to or from the Commonwealth, a county, a local government unit or a conservancy under authority of the "Agricultural Area Security Law."(v) A transfer of a conservation easement or preservation easement under the act of June 22, 2001 (P.L.390, No.29), known as the "Conservation and Preservation Easements Act."20250SB0238PN0192 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) A transfer of a perpetual historic preservation easement, a perpetual public trail easement or other perpetual public recreational use easement, a perpetual scenic preservation easement or a perpetual open-space preservation easement to or from the United States, the Commonwealth, a county, a local government unit or a conservancy.(vii) A transfer of real estate that is subject to an agricultural conservation easement established under authority of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the "Agricultural Area Security Law," to a qualified beginner farmer.(19) A transfer of real estate devoted to the business of agriculture to a family farm business by:(i) a member of the same family which directly owns at least seventy-five per cent of each class of the stock thereof or the interests in that family farm business; or(ii) a family farm business, which family directly owns at least seventy-five per cent of each class of stock thereof or the interests in that family farm business.(20) A transfer between members of the same family of an ownership interest in a real estate company or family farm business that owns real estate.(21) A transaction wherein the tax due is one dollar ($1) or less.(22) Leases for the production or extraction of coal, oil, natural gas or minerals and assignments thereof.In order to exercise any exclusion provided in this section, the true, full and complete value of the transfer shall be shown on the statement of value. For leases of coal, oil, natural gas or minerals, the statement of value may be limited to an 20250SB0238PN0192 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 explanation of the reason such document is not subject to tax under this article.(23) A transfer of real estate to or by a volunteer EMS company, volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company as those terms are defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).(24) A transfer of real estate to or by a land bank. For the purposes of this clause, the term "land bank" shall have the same meaning as given to it in 68 Pa.C.S. § 2103 (relating to definitions).(25) Beginning on or after December 31, 2015, a transfer of real estate by a housing authority created under the act of May 28, 1937 (P.L.955, No.265), referred to as the Housing Authorities Law, to a nonprofit organization which is utilizing the real estate for the purpose of Rental Assistance Demonstration administered by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under the Consolidated and Further Continuing Appropriations Act, 2012 (Public Law 112-55, 125 Stat. 552).Section 1102-C.4. Documents Relating to Associations or Corporations and Members, Partners, Stockholders or Shareholders Thereof.--Except as otherwise provided in sections 1102-C.3 and 1102-C.5, documents which make, confirm or evidence any transfer or demise of title to real estate between associations or corporations and the members, partners, shareholders or stockholders thereof are fully taxable. For the purposes of this article, corporations and associations are entities separate from their members, partners, stockholders or shareholders.Section 1102-C.5. Acquired Company.--(a) A real estate company is an acquired company upon a change in the ownership 20250SB0238PN0192 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest in the company, however effected, if the change:(1) does not affect the continuity of the company; and(2) of itself or together with prior changes has the effect of transferring, directly or indirectly, ninety per cent or more of the total ownership interest in the company within a period of three years.(3) For the purposes of paragraph (2), a transfer occurs within a period of three years of another transfer or transfers if, during the period, the transferring party provides the transferee a legally binding commitment or option, enforceable at a future date, to execute the transfer.(b.2) A family farm business is an acquired company when, because of voluntary or involuntary dissolution, it ceases to be a family farm business or when, because of the issuance or transfer of stock in the corporation or transfer of interests in the association or because of acquisition or transfer of assets that are devoted to the business of agriculture, it fails to meet the minimum requirements of a family farm business under this article.(b.3) The conveyance of assets held by one family farm business to another family farm business shall not be considered a transfer of assets under this article if the same individuals hold at least fifty per cent of the ownership interest in each family farm business.(c) Within thirty days after becoming an acquired company, the company shall present a declaration of acquisition with the recorder of each county in which it holds real estate for the affixation of documentary stamps and recording. Such declaration shall set forth the value of real estate holdings of the acquired company in such county.20250SB0238PN0192 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1102-C.6. Transfer of Tax.--(a) Subject to subsection (b), beginning July 31, 2019, and each July 31 thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the Housing Affordability and Rehabilitation Enhancement Fund under Article IV-D of the act of December 3, 1959 (P.L.1688, No.621), known as the "Housing Finance Agency Law," an amount under subsection (b).(b) The amount transferred under subsection (a) may not exceed the following:(1) For each fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2019, and ending prior to July 1, 2023, forty million dollars ($40,000,000).(2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, and each fiscal year thereafter, sixty million dollars ($60,000,000).(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce or prohibit increased funding for the Housing Affordability and Rehabilitation Enhancement Fund or the Keystone Recreation, Park and Conservation Fund as provided in the "Housing Finance Agency Law" or other law.Section 1103-C. Credits Against Tax.--(a) Where there is a transfer of a residential property by a licensed real estate broker which property was transferred to him within the preceding year as consideration for the purchase of other residential property, a credit for the amount of the tax paid at the time of the transfer to him shall be given to him toward the amount of the tax due upon the transfer.(b) Where there is a transfer by a builder of residential property which was transferred to the builder within the preceding year as consideration for the purchase of new, previously unoccupied residential property, a credit for the 20250SB0238PN0192 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount of the tax paid at the time of the transfer to the builder shall be given to the builder toward the amount of the tax due upon the transfer.(c) Where there is a transfer of real estate which is demised by the grantor, a credit for the amount of tax paid at the time of the demise shall be given the grantor toward the tax due upon the transfer.(d) Where there is a conveyance by deed of real estate which was previously sold under a land contract by the grantor, a credit for the amount of tax paid at the time of the sale shall be given the grantor toward the tax due upon the deed.(e) If the tax due upon the transfer is greater than the credit given under this section, the difference shall be paid. If the credit allowed is greater than the amount of tax due, no refund or carryover credit shall be allowed.Section 1103-C.1. Extension of Lease.--In determining the term of a lease, it shall be presumed that a right or option to renew or extend a lease will be exercised if the rental charge to the lessee is fixed or if a method for calculating the rental charge is established.Section 1104-C. Proceeds of Judicial Sale.--The tax herein imposed shall be fully paid, and have priority out of the proceeds of any judicial sale of real estate before any other obligation, claim, lien, judgment, estate or costs of the sale and of the writ upon which the sale is made, and the sheriff, or other officer, conducting said sale, shall pay the tax herein imposed out of the first moneys paid to him in connection therewith. If the proceeds of the sale are insufficient to pay the entire tax herein imposed, the purchaser shall be liable for the remaining tax.20250SB0238PN0192 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1105-C. Documentary Stamps.--(a) The payment of the tax imposed by this article shall be evidenced by the affixing of a documentary stamp or stamps to every document by the person making, executing, delivering or presenting for recording such document. Such stamps shall be affixed in such manner that their removal will require the continued application of steam or water, and the person using or affixing such stamps shall write or stamp or cause to be written or stamped thereon the initials of his name and the date upon which such stamps are affixed or used so that such stamps may not again be used: Provided, That the department may prescribe such other method of cancellation as it may deem expedient.(b) The use of documentary license meter impressions or similar indicia of payment in lieu of stamps as required by this article may be permitted in the discretion of the department.Section 1106-C. Stamps, Commissions, Payments and Transfers.--(a) The department shall prescribe, prepare and furnish stamps to each recorder of deeds, of such denominations and quantities as may be necessary, for the payment of the tax imposed and assessed by this article.(b) The department shall allow each county a commission equal to one per cent of the face value of the stamps sold or two hundred fifty dollars ($250) whichever is greater. The recorder of deeds shall pay the commission herein allowed to the general fund of the county. The department shall pay the premium or premiums on any bond or bonds required by law to be procured by recorder of deeds for the performance of their duties under this article.(c) All moneys paid in accordance with this article shall be credited to the General Fund.20250SB0238PN0192 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) At the end of each month, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the Keystone Recreation, Park and Conservation Fund an amount equal to the tax credited to the General Fund under subsection (c) for the previous month multiplied by the applicable transfer factor. The applicable transfer factor for each month shall be as follows:Month Transfer FactorJuly 1994 through December 2001 0.15January 2002 through June 2002 0.10July 2002 through June 2003 0.075July 2003 through June 2006 0.15July 2006 through June 2007 0.021July 2007 and each month thereafter 0.15Section 1107-C. Enforcement; Rules and Regulations.--The department is hereby charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this article and is hereby authorized and empowered to prescribe, adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations relating to:(1) The method and means to be used in affixing or cancelling of stamps in substitution for or in addition to the method and means provided in this article.(2) The denominations and sale of stamps.(3) Any other matter or thing pertaining to the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this 20250SB0238PN0192 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article.Section 1108-C. Failure to Affix Stamps.--No document upon which tax is imposed by this article shall at any time be made the basis of any action or other legal proceeding, nor shall proof thereof be offered or received in evidence in any court of this Commonwealth, or recorded in the office of any recorder of deeds of any county of this Commonwealth, unless a documentary stamp or stamps as provided in this article have been affixed thereto.Section 1109-C. Statement of Value; Penalty.--(a) Every document lodged with or presented to any recorder of deeds in this Commonwealth for recording, shall set forth therein and as a part of such document the true, full and complete value thereof, or shall be accompanied by a statement of value executed by a responsible person connected with the transaction showing such connection and setting forth the true, full and complete value thereof or the reason, if any, why such document is not subject to tax under this article. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any excludable real estate transfers which are exempt from taxation based on family relationship. Other documents presented for the affixation of stamps shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the document and statement of value executed by a responsible person connected with the transaction showing such connection and setting forth the true, full and complete value thereof or the reason, if any, why such document is not subject to tax under this article.(b) Any recorder of deeds who shall record any document upon which tax is imposed by this article without the proper documentary stamp or stamps affixed thereto as required by this 20250SB0238PN0192 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article as is indicated in such document or accompanying statement of value shall, upon summary conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of fifty dollars ($50) and costs of prosecution, and in default of payment thereof, undergo imprisonment for not more than thirty days.Section 1109-C.1. Civil Penalties.--(a) If any part of any underpayment of tax imposed by this article is due to fraud, there shall be added to the tax an amount equal to fifty per cent of the underpayment.(b) In the case of failure to record a declaration required under this article on the date prescribed therefor, unless it is shown that such failure is due to reasonable cause, there shall be added to the tax five per cent of the amount of such tax if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional five per cent for each additional month or fraction thereof during which such failure continues, not exceeding fifty per cent in the aggregate.Section 1110-C. Unlawful Acts; Penalty.--(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to:(1) accept or present for recording or cause to be accepted or presented for recording any document, without the full amount of tax thereon being duly paid; or,(2) make use of any documentary stamp to denote payment of any tax imposed by this article without cancelling such stamp as required by this article or as prescribed by the department; or,(3) fail, neglect or refuse to comply with or violate the rules and regulations prescribed, adopted and promulgated by the department under the provisions of this article.(b) Any person violating any of the provisions of subsection (a) shall be guilty of a summary offense.20250SB0238PN0192 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) It shall be unlawful for any person to:(1) fraudulently cut, tear or remove from a document any documentary stamp; or,(2) fraudulently affix to any document upon which tax is imposed by this article any documentary stamp which has been cut, torn or removed from any other document upon which tax is imposed by this article, or any documentary stamp of insufficient value, or any forged or counterfeited stamp, or any impression of any forged or counterfeited stamp, die, plate or other article; or,(3) wilfully remove or alter the cancellation marks of any documentary stamp, or restore any such documentary stamp, with intent to use or cause the same to be used after it has already been used, or knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, or give away any such altered or restored stamp to any person for use, or knowingly use the same; or,(4) knowingly have in his possession any altered or restored documentary stamp which has been removed from any document upon which tax is imposed by this article: Provided, That the possession of such stamps shall be prima facie evidence of an intent to violate the provisions of this clause; or,(5) knowingly or wilfully prepare, keep, sell, offer for sale, or have in his possession, any forged or counterfeited documentary stamps.(d) Any person violating any of the provisions of subsection (c) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree.(e) A person who makes a false statement of value or declaration of acquisition, when he does not believe the statement or declaration to be true, is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree.20250SB0238PN0192 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1111-C. Assessment and Notice of Tax; Review.--(a) If any person shall fail to pay any tax imposed by this article for which he is liable, the department is hereby authorized and empowered to make an assessment of additional tax and interest due by such person based upon any information within its possession or that shall come into its possession. All of such assessments shall be made within three years after the date of the recording of the document, subject to the following:(1) If the taxpayer underpays the correct amount of the tax by twenty-five per cent or more, the tax may be assessed at any time within six years after the date of the recording of the document.(2) If any part of an underpayment of tax is due to fraud or an undisclosed, intentional disregard of rules and regulations, the full amount of the tax may be assessed at any time.(b) Promptly after the date of such assessment, the department shall send a copy thereof, including the basis of the assessment, to the person against whom it was made. Any taxpayer against whom an assessment is made may petition the department for a reassessment pursuant to Article XXVII.Section 1112-C. Lien.--(a) Any tax determined to be due by the department and remaining unpaid after demand for the same, and all penalties and interest thereon, shall be a lien in favor of the Commonwealth upon the property, both real and personal, of such person but only after said lien has been entered and docketed of record by the prothonotary of the county where such property is situated.(a.1) At any time after it makes an assessment of additional tax, penalty or interest, the department may transmit to the prothonotaries of the respective counties certified copies of 20250SB0238PN0192 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all liens for such taxes, penalties and interest, and it shall be the duty of each prothonotary receiving the lien to enter and docket the same of record in his office, which lien shall be indexed as judgments are now indexed. After the department's assessment becomes final, a writ of execution may directly issue upon such lien without the issuance and prosecution to judgment of a writ of scire facias: Provided, That not less than ten days before issuance of any execution on the lien, notice shall be sent by certified mail to the taxpayer at his last known post office address. No prothonotary shall require as a condition precedent to the entry of such liens, the payment of any costs incident thereto.(b) The lien imposed hereunder shall have priority from the date of its recording as aforesaid, and shall be fully paid and satisfied out of the proceeds of any judicial sale of property subject thereto before any other obligation, judgment, claim, lien or estate to which said property may subsequently become subject, except costs of the sale and of the writ upon which the sale was made, and real estate taxes and municipal claims against such property, but shall be subordinate to mortgages and other liens existing and duly recorded or entered of record prior to the recording of the tax lien. In the case of a judicial sale of property subject to a lien imposed hereunder upon a lien or claim over which the lien imposed hereunder has priority, as aforesaid, such sale shall discharge the lien imposed hereunder to the extent only that the proceeds are applied to its payment, and such lien shall continue in full force and effect as to the balance remaining unpaid.(c) The lien imposed hereunder shall continue for five years from the date of its entry of record, and may be renewed and 20250SB0238PN0192 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 continued in the manner now or hereafter provided for the renewal of judgments, or as may be provided in the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."Section 1113-C. Refunds.--(a) Whenever the amount due upon assessment or review is less than the amount paid to the department on account thereof, the department shall enter a credit in the amount of such difference to the account of the person who paid the tax.(b) Where there has been no assessment of unpaid tax, the department shall have the power, and its duty shall be, to hear and decide any application for refund and, upon the allowance of such application, to enter a credit in the amount of the overpayment to the account of the person who paid the tax. Such application must be filed under Article XXVII.Section 1114-C. Sharing Information.--Notwithstanding the provisions of any other act, the department may divulge to the proper officer of a political subdivision imposing a local real estate transfer tax, or the authorized representative of that officer, information gained pursuant to the department's administration or collection respecting the collection of realty transfer tax under this article.]Section 2. Sections 1101-D, 1102-D, 1103-D(a) and 1110-D(b)(1) and (d) of the act are amended to read:Section 1101-D. Imposition.--The duly constituted authorities of the following political subdivisions--cities of the second class, cities of the second class A, cities of the third class, boroughs, incorporated towns, townships of the first class, townships of the second class, school districts of the first class A, school districts of the second class, school districts of the third class and school districts of the fourth 20250SB0238PN0192 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 class, in all cases including independent school districts--may, in their discretion, by ordinance or resolution, for general revenue purposes, levy, assess and collect or provide for the levying, assessment and collection of a tax upon a transfer of real property or an interest in real property within the limits of the political subdivision, regardless of where the instruments making the transfers are made, executed or delivered or where the actual settlements on the transfer take place[, to the extent that the transactions are subject to the tax imposed by Article XI-C]. A tax imposed under this article shall be subject to rate limitations provided by section 5, section 8 and section 17 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as "The Local Tax Enabling Act."Section 1102-D. Administration.--(a) The tax authorized under this article shall be administered, collected and enforced under the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as "The Local Tax Enabling Act," provided, however, that, if the correct amount of the tax is not paid by the last date prescribed for timely payment [as provided for in section 1102-C], the department may determine the tax, interest and penalty as provided for in section 1109-D [and may collect and enforce the tax, interest and penalty in the same manner as tax, interest and penalty imposed by Article XI-C].[(b) Whenever a declaration is required to be filed under Article XI-C, a declaration is also required to be filed under this article.]Section 1103-D. Regulations.--[(a) The regulations promulgated under Article XI-C shall be applicable to the taxes imposed under this article.]* * *20250SB0238PN0192 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1110-D. Lien.--* * *(b) (1) At any time after it makes a determination of additional tax, penalty or interest under this article, the department may transmit to the prothonotaries of the respective counties certified copies of all liens for the taxes, penalties and interest under this article [or copies of all liens under Article XI-C and this article] on a single form.* * *[(d) A lien imposed under this article shall be equal in priority to the lien imposed under Article XI-C.]Section 3. The Department of Revenue may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this act.Section 4. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0238PN0192 - 28 - 123456789101112131415